Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB347.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13(a) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a clause and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13. Prohibited Acts; Penalties.--(a) The following acts and the causing thereof within the Commonwealth are hereby prohibited:* * *(41) The operation of a clinic or establishment that 12345678910111213141516171819202122 knowingly provides space for any person to inject, ingest, inhale or otherwise introduce into the person's body a controlled substance in violation of this act. The following shall apply:(i) Each district attorney of a county where the clinic or establishment is located shall have authority to investigate and to institute criminal proceedings for any violation of this clause.(ii) In addition to the authority conferred upon the Attorney General by the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the "Commonwealth Attorneys Act," the Attorney General shall have the authority to investigate and to institute criminal proceedings for any violation of this clause.(iii) No person charged with a violation of this clause by the Attorney General shall have standing to challenge the authority of the Attorney General to investigate or prosecute the case and, if any challenge is made, the challenge shall be dismissed and no relief shall be available in the courts of this Commonwealth to the person making the challenge.(iv) Nothing contained in subclause (i), (ii) or (iii) shall be construed to limit the regulatory or investigative authority of any department or agency of the Commonwealth relating to persons, enterprises or matters within the scope of this section.(v) Nothing in this clause shall be construed to:(A) Prohibit the provision of space for the use of a medical marijuana product as long as that use is in conformance with the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the "Medical Marijuana Act."(B) Prohibit a practitioner from prescribing, administering 20250SB0347PN0284 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or dispensing a controlled substance in a manner that is otherwise permitted under this act.* * *(q) Any person who violates clause (41) of subsection (a) : (1) Is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than twenty years or a fine of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or both, or a fine of two million dollars ($2,000,000) for a person other than an individual.(2) Shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The Attorney General shall have the power and duty to institute proceedings to recover the civil penalty provided under this clause against any person liable to the Commonwealth for a penalty.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0347PN0284 - 3 - 123456789101112131415